Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-8247
Trauma system quality assurance program; how established; participation.

The board shall establish a committee for each trauma region to maintain a trauma system quality assurance program established and maintained by the health care facilities designated as advanced, basic, comprehensive, and general level trauma centers. The quality assurance program shall evaluate trauma data quality, trauma care delivery, patient care outcomes, and compliance with the Statewide Trauma System Act. The regional medical director shall participate in the program and all health care providers and facilities which provide trauma care services within the region shall be invited to participate in the quality assurance program.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 47;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 107;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 116.